Utah statutes.
4-26-5.   Adjoining landowners -- Partition fences -- Contribution.
If two or more persons agree to a fence enclosure or to the construction of a
partition fence, the cost of construction and maintenance of the fence shall
be apportioned between each party to the agreement based upon the amount of
land enclosed.  A person who is a party to such agreement and who fails to
maintain such person's part of the fence is liable in a civil action for any
damage sustained by another party to the agreement as a result of the failure
to maintain the fence.  If a person has enclosed land with a fence and the
owner of adjoining land desires to enclose land adjoining the fence so that
the existing fence or any part of it will become a partition fence between
such tracts of land, the owner of the adjoining land shall before making the
enclosure pay to the owner of the existing fence one-half of the value of all
that part of the fence that will become a partition fence; and when one party
ceases to improve or cultivate his land or opens his enclosure he may not take
away any part of the partition fence belonging to him, if the owner or
occupant of the adjoining enclosure within 30 days after notice, pays for the
value of such fence; nor shall the partition fence be removed if the crops
enclosed by it will be exposed to injury.
